California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
Consistent with the authority of the State Department of State Hospitals to maintain and operate state hospitals under its jurisdiction, the State Department of State Hospitals shall provide internal security for the patient population at Patton State Hospital. The State Department of State Hospitals may employ hospital police at Patton State Hospital for this purpose.

This section is not intended to increase or decrease the duties and responsibilities of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation at Patton State Hospital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 84.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4109.

The State Department of State Hospitals has general control and direction of the property and concerns of each state hospital specified in Section 4100. The department shall:

(a) Take care of the interests of the hospital, and see that its purpose and its bylaws, rules, and regulations are carried into effect, according to law.

(b) Establish such bylaws, rules, and regulations as it deems necessary and expedient for regulating the duties of officers and employees of the hospital, and for its internal government, discipline, and management.

(c) Maintain an effective inspection of
 the hospital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 85.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4109.5.

(a) Whenever the department proposes the closure of a state hospital, it shall submit as part of the Governor’s proposed budget to the Legislature a complete program, to be developed jointly by the State Department of State Hospitals and the county in which the state hospital is located, for absorbing as many of the staff of the hospital into the local mental health programs as may be needed by the county. Those programs shall include a redefinition of occupational positions, if necessary, and a recognition by the counties of licensed psychiatric technicians for treatment of persons with developmental disabilities, persons with mental health disorders, drug abusers, and alcoholics.

(b) The Director of State Hospitals shall submit all plans for the closure of state
 hospitals as a report with the department’s budget. This report shall include all of the following:

(1) The land and buildings affected.

(2) The number of patients affected.

(3) Alternative plans for patients presently in the facilities.

(4) Alternative plans for patients who would have been served by the facility assuming it was not closed.

(5) A joint statement of the impact of the closure by the department and affected local treatment programs.

(c) These plans may be submitted to the Legislature until April 1 of each budget year. Plans submitted after that date shall not be considered until the fiscal year following that
 in which it was submitted.

(d) The plan shall not be placed into effect unless the Legislature specifically approves the plan.

(e) This section shall not apply to the proposed closure of a developmental center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 65.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4110.

The executive director shall provide detailed expenditure estimates of all anticipated hospital expenditures, all supplies, expenses, buildings, and improvements as required for the best interests of the hospital, and for the improvement of the hospital and of the grounds and buildings connected with the hospital. These estimates shall be submitted to the State Department of State Hospitals, which may revise them. The department shall certify that it has carefully examined the estimates, and that the supplies, expenses, buildings, and improvements contained in the estimates, as approved by it, are required for the best interests of the hospital. The department shall thereupon proceed to purchase the supplies, make the expenditures, or conduct the improvements or
 buildings in accordance with law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 87.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4111.

The state hospitals may manufacture supplies and materials necessary or required to be used in any of the state hospitals which can be economically manufactured therein. The necessary cost and expense of providing for and conducting the manufacture of such supplies and materials shall be paid in the same manner as other expenses of the hospitals. No hospital shall enter into or engage in manufacturing any supplies or materials unless permission for the same is obtained from the State Department of State Hospitals. If, at any time, it appears to the department that the manufacture of any article is not being or cannot be economically carried on at a state hospital, the department may suspend or stop the manufacture of the article, and on receipt of a certified copy of
 the order directing the suspension or stopping of its manufacture, by the medical superintendent, the hospital shall cease from manufacturing the article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 88.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4112.

(a) All money belonging to the state and received by state hospitals from any source, except appropriations, shall, at the end of each month, be deposited in the State Treasury, to the credit of the General Fund. This section shall not apply to the funds known as the industrial or amusement funds.

(b) There is hereby continuously appropriated from the General Fund to the State Department of State Hospitals that amount which is necessary to pay the premium, as specified in Section 7353, for third-party health coverage for Medicare beneficiaries who are patients at state hospitals under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals. It is the intent of the Legislature that
 the General Fund expenditures authorized by this subdivision not exceed the proceeds to be deposited in the General Fund from Medicare payments to the State Department of State Hospitals in any fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 89.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4112.1.

Section 4112 does not apply to the funds known as the “sheltered workshop funds.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 722.)
-------------------------------------------

4113.

The state hospitals and the officers thereof shall make such financial statements to the Controller as the Controller requires.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

4114.

The executive director or other person in charge of a hospital shall, within 10 days after the admission of any person to the hospital, cause an abstract of the medical certificate and order on which the person was received and a list of all property, books, and papers of value found in the possession of or belonging to the person to be forwarded to the office of the department, and when a patient is discharged, transferred, or dies, the superintendent or person in charge shall within three days thereafter, send the information to the office of the department, in accordance with the form prescribed by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 90.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4115.

The department may permit, subject to such conditions and regulations as it may impose, any religious or missionary corporation or society to erect a building on the grounds of any state hospital for the holding of religious services. Each such building when erected shall become the property of the state and shall be used exclusively for the benefit of the patients and employees of the state hospital.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

4116.

The department may establish and supervise under its rules and regulations training schools or courses for employees of the department or of state institutions under its jurisdiction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

4117.

(a) Whenever a trial is had of any person charged with escape or attempt to escape from a state hospital, whenever a hearing is had on the return of a writ of habeas corpus prosecuted by or on behalf of any person confined in a state hospital except in a proceeding to which Section 5110 applies, whenever a hearing is had on a petition under Section 1026.2, subdivision (b) of Section 1026.5, Section 2966, or Section 2972 of the Penal Code, Section 7361 of this code, or former Section 6316.2 of this code for the release of a person confined in a state hospital, whenever a hearing is had for an order seeking involuntary treatment with psychotropic medication, or any other medication for which an order is required, of a person confined in a state hospital pursuant to Section 2962 of the Penal
 Code, and whenever a person confined in a state hospital is tried for a crime committed therein, the appropriate financial officer or other designated official of the county in which the trial or hearing is had shall make out a statement of all mental health treatment costs and shall make out a separate statement of all nontreatment costs incurred by the county for investigation and other preparation for the trial or hearing, and the actual trial or hearing, all costs of maintaining custody of the patient and transporting him or her to and from the hospital, and costs of appeal. The statements shall be properly certified by a judge of the superior court of that county. The statement of mental health treatment costs shall be sent to the State Department of State Hospitals and the statement of all nontreatment costs, except as provided in subdivision (c), shall be sent to the Controller for approval. After approval, the department shall cause the amount of mental health treatment costs incurred on or after
 July 1, 1987, to be paid to the county behavioral health director or his or her designee when the trial or hearing was held out of the money appropriated for this purpose by the Legislature. In addition, the Controller shall cause the amount of all nontreatment costs incurred on and after July 1, 1987, to be paid out of the money appropriated by the Legislature, to the county treasurer of the county where the trial or hearing was had.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2012, the nontreatment costs associated with Section 2966 of the Penal Code and approved by the Controller, as required by subdivision (a), shall be paid by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation pursuant to Section 4750 of the Penal Code.

(c) The nontreatment costs associated with any hearing for an order seeking involuntary treatment with psychotropic medication, or any other medication for which an order is
 required, of a person confined in a state hospital pursuant to Section 1026, 1026.5, or 2972 of the Penal Code, as provided in subdivision (a), shall be paid by the county of commitment. As used in this subdivision, “county of commitment” means the county seeking the continued treatment of a mentally disordered offender pursuant to Section 2972 of the Penal Code or the county committing a patient who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity pursuant to Section 1026 or 1026.5 of the Penal Code. The appropriate financial officer or other designated official of the county in which the proceeding is held shall make out a statement of all of the costs incurred by the county for the investigation, preparation, and conduct of the proceedings, and the costs of appeal, if any. The statement shall be certified by a judge of the superior court of the county. The statement shall then be sent to the county of commitment, which shall reimburse the county providing the services.

(d) (1) Whenever a hearing is held pursuant to Section 1604, 1608, 1609, or 2966 of the Penal Code, all transportation costs to and from a state hospital or a facility designated by the community program director during the hearing shall be paid by the Controller as provided in this subdivision. The appropriate financial officer or other designated official of the county in which a hearing is held shall make out a statement of all transportation costs incurred by the county. The statement shall be properly certified by a judge of the superior court of that county and sent to the Controller for approval. The Controller shall cause the amount of transportation costs incurred on and after July 1, 1987, to be paid to the county treasurer of the county where the hearing was had out of the money appropriated by the Legislature.

(2) As used in this subdivision,
 “community program director” means the person designated pursuant to Section 1605 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 26, Sec. 47) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 16.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.

(a) The State Department of State Hospitals shall investigate and examine all nonresident persons residing in a state hospital and shall cause these persons, when found to be nonresidents as defined in this chapter, to be promptly and humanely returned under proper supervision to the states in which they have legal residence. The department may defer that action by reason of a patient’s medical condition.

(b) Prior to returning the judicially committed nonresident to his or her proper state of residency, the department shall do either of the following:

(1) Obtain the written consent of the prosecuting attorney of the committing county, the judicially committed nonresident person, and the attorney of
 record for the judicially committed nonresident person.

(2) In the department’s discretion request a hearing in the superior court of the committing county requesting a judicial determination of the proposed transfer, notify the court that the state of residence has agreed to the transfer, and file the department’s recommendation with a report explaining the reasons for its recommendation.

(c) The court shall give notice of the hearing to the prosecuting attorney, the judicially committed nonresident person, the attorney of record for the judicially committed nonresident person, and the department, no less than 30 days before the hearing. At the hearing, the prosecuting attorney and the judicially committed nonresident person may present evidence bearing on the intended transfer. After considering all evidence presented, the court shall determine whether the intended transfer is
 in the best interest of, and for the proper protection of, the nonresident person and the public. The court shall use the same procedures and standard of proof as used in conducting probation revocation hearings pursuant to Section 1203.2 of the Penal Code.

(d) For the purpose of facilitating the prompt and humane return of these persons, the State Department of State Hospitals may enter into reciprocal agreements with the proper boards, commissions, or officers of other states or political subdivision thereof for the mutual exchange or return of persons residing in any state hospital in one state whose legal residence is in the other, and it may in these reciprocal agreements vary the period of residence as defined in this chapter to meet the requirements or laws of the other states.

(e) The department may give written permission for the return of a resident of this state
 confined in a public institution in another state, corresponding to a state hospital of this state. When a resident is returned to this state pursuant to this chapter, he or she may be admitted as a voluntary patient to an institution of the department as designated by the Director of State Hospitals. If he or she has a mental health disorder and is a danger to himself or herself or others, or he or she is gravely disabled, he or she may be detained and given care and services in accordance with the provisions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 66.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4120.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, in determining residence for purposes of being entitled to hospitalization in this state and for purposes of returning patients to the states of their residence, an adult person who has lived continuously in this state for a period of one year and who has not acquired residence in another state by living continuously therein for at least one year subsequent to his residence in this state shall be deemed to be a resident of this state. Except as otherwise provided in this section a minor is entitled to hospitalization in this state if the parent or guardian or conservator having custody of the minor has lived continuously in this state for a period of one year and has not acquired residence in another state by living continuously therein for
 at least one year subsequent to his residence in this state. The parent, guardian, or conservator shall be deemed a resident of this state for the purposes of this section, and the minor shall be eligible for hospitalization in this state as a person with a mental health disorder. The eligibility of the minor for hospitalization in this state ceases when the parent, guardian, or conservator ceases to be a resident of this state and the minor shall be transferred to the state of residence of the parent, guardian, or conservator in accordance with the applicable provisions of this code. Time spent in a public institution for the care of persons with developmental disabilities or mental health disorders, or on leave of absence therefrom, shall not be counted in determining the matter of residence in this or another state.

(b) Residence acquired in this or in another state shall not be lost by reason of military service in the Armed Forces of the
 United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 67.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4121.

(a) All expenses incurred in returning these persons to other states shall be paid by this state, the person, or his or her relatives, but the expense of returning residents of this state shall be borne by the states making the returns.

(b) The cost and expense incurred in effecting the transportation of these nonresident persons to the states in which they have residence shall be advanced from the funds appropriated for that purpose, or, if necessary, from the money appropriated for the care of persons who are delinquent or have mental health disorders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 68.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4122.

The State Department of State Hospitals, when it deems it necessary, may, under conditions prescribed by the director, transfer any patients of a state institution under its jurisdiction to another institution. Transfers of patients of state hospitals shall be made in accordance with Section 7300.

The expense of any transfer shall be paid from the moneys available by law for the support of the department or for the support of the institution from which the patient is
 transferred. Liability for the care, support, and maintenance of
 the transferred patient in the institution to which they have been transferred shall be the same as if they had originally been committed to the institution. The State Department of State Hospitals shall present to the county, not more frequently than monthly, a claim for the amount due the state for care, support, and maintenance of those patients and which the county shall process and pay pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 29700)
 of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 349.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4123.

The Director of State Hospitals may authorize the transfer of persons from any institution within the department to any institution authorized by the federal government to receive the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 95.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4124.

The State Department of State Hospitals shall send to the Department of Veterans Affairs whenever requested a list of all persons who have been patients for six months or more in each state institution within the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals and who are known to have served in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 96.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4125.

(a) The director may deposit any funds of any patient in the possession of each hospital administrator of a state hospital in trust with the treasurer pursuant to Section 16305.3 of the Government Code or, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance, may deposit these funds in an interest-bearing bank account or invest and reinvest these funds in any security described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 16430) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for the purposes of deposit or investment only may mingle the funds of any patient with the funds of any other patient. The hospital administrator with the consent of the patient may deposit the interest or increment on the funds of a patient in the state hospital in a special fund for each state hospital, to be designated the “Benefit Fund,” of which the hospital administrator shall be the trustee. He or she may, with the approval of the director, after taking into consideration the recommendations of representatives of patient government and recommendations submitted by patient groups, expend the moneys in this fund for the education or entertainment of the patients of the institution.

(b) On and after December 1, 1970:

(1) The funds of a patient in a state hospital or a patient on leave of absence from a state hospital shall not be deposited in interest-bearing bank accounts or invested and reinvested pursuant to this section except when authorized by the patient.

(2) Any interest or increment accruing on the funds of a patient on leave of absence from a state hospital shall be deposited in his or her account.

(3) Any interest or increment accruing on the funds of a patient in a state hospital shall be deposited in his or her account, unless the patient authorizes their deposit in the state hospital’s benefit fund.

(c) Any state hospital charges for patient care against the funds of a patient in the possession of a hospital administrator or deposited pursuant to this section and used to pay for that care, shall be stated in an itemized bill to the patient.

(d) No later than August 15 of each year, the director shall provide to the Legislature a summary data sheet containing information on how the benefit fund at each state hospital was expended in the previous fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 352, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4126.

Whenever any patient in any state institution subject to the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals dies, and any personal funds or property of the patient remains in the hands of the superintendent thereof, and no demand is made upon the superintendent by the owner of the funds or property or his or her legally appointed representative all money and other personal property of the decedent remaining in the custody or possession of the superintendent thereof shall be held by him or her for a period of one year from the date of death of the decedent, for the benefit of the heirs, legatees, or successors in interest of the decedent.

Upon the expiration of the one-year period, any money remaining unclaimed in the
 custody or possession of the superintendent shall be delivered by him or her to the Treasurer for deposit in the Unclaimed Property Fund under the provision of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1440) of Chapter 6 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

Upon the expiration of said one-year period, all personal property and documents of the decedent, other than cash, remaining unclaimed in the custody or possession of the superintendent, shall be disposed of as follows:

(a) All deeds, contracts or assignments shall be filed by the superintendent with the public administrator of the county of commitment of the decedent;

(b) All other personal property shall be sold by the superintendent at public auction, or upon a sealed-bid basis, and the proceeds of the sale delivered by him or her to the Treasurer in the same manner as is
 herein provided with respect to unclaimed money of the decedent. If he or she deems it expedient to do so, the superintendent may accumulate the property of several decedents and sell the property in lots that he or she may determine, provided that he or she makes a determination as to each decedent’s share of the proceeds;

(c) If any personal property of the decedent is not salable at public auction, or upon a sealed-bid basis, or if it has no intrinsic value, or if its value is not sufficient to justify the deposit of such property in the State Treasury, the superintendent may order it destroyed;

(d) All other unclaimed personal property of the decedent not disposed of as provided in subdivision (a), (b), or (c), shall be delivered by the superintendent to the Controller for deposit in the State Treasury under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1440) of Chapter
 6 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 97.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4127.

(a) Whenever any patient in any state institution subject to the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals escapes, is discharged, or is on leave of absence from the institution, and any personal funds or property of the patient remains in the hands of the superintendent, and no demand is made upon the superintendent by the owner of the funds or property or his or her legally appointed representative, all money and other intangible personal property of the patient, other than deeds, contracts, or assignments, remaining in the custody or possession of the superintendent shall be held by him or her for a period of seven years from the date of the escape, discharge, or leave of absence, for the benefit of the patient or his or her
 successors in interest. Unclaimed personal funds or property of minors on leave of absence may be exempted from this section during the period of their minority and for a period of one year thereafter, at the discretion of the Director of State Hospitals.

(b) Upon the expiration of the seven-year period, any money and other intangible property, other than deeds, contracts, or assignments, remaining unclaimed in the custody or possession of the superintendent shall be subject to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) Upon the expiration of one year from the date of the escape, discharge, or parole, the following shall apply:

(1) All deeds, contracts, or assignments shall be filed by the superintendent with the public administrator of the county of commitment
 of the patient.

(2) All tangible personal property other than money, remaining unclaimed in the superintendent’s custody or possession, shall be sold by the superintendent at public auction, or upon a sealed-bid basis, and the proceeds of the sale shall be held by him or her subject to Section 4125 of this code and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. If the superintendent deems it expedient to do so, the superintendent may accumulate the property of several patients and may sell the property in lots that the superintendent determines, provided that the superintendent makes a determination as to each patient’s share of the proceeds.

(d) If any tangible personal property covered by this section is not salable at public auction or upon a sealed-bid basis, or if it has no intrinsic value or its value is not sufficient to
 justify its retention by the superintendent to be offered for sale at public auction or upon a sealed-bid basis at a later date, the superintendent may order it destroyed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 98.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4128.

Before any money or other personal property or documents are delivered to the State Treasurer, State Controller, or public administrator, or sold at auction or upon a sealed-bid basis, or destroyed, under the provisions of Section 4126, and before any personal property or documents are delivered to the public administrator, or sold at auction or upon a sealed-bid basis, or destroyed, under the provisions of Section 4127, of this code, notice of said intended disposition shall be posted at least 30 days prior to the disposition, in a public place at the institution where the disposition is to be made, and a copy of such notice shall be mailed to the last known address of the owner or deceased owner, at least 30 days prior to such disposition. The notice prescribed by this section need not specifically describe each item of property to be disposed of.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

4129.

At the time of delivering any money or other personal property to the State Treasurer or State Controller under the provisions of Section 4126 or of Chapter 7 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the superintendent shall deliver to the State Controller a schedule setting forth a statement and description of all money and other personal property delivered, and the name and last known address of the owner or deceased owner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

4130.

When any personal property has been destroyed as provided in Sections 4126 or 4127, no suit shall thereafter be maintained by any person against the state or any officer thereof for or on account of such property.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

4131.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the provisions of Sections 4126 and 4127 shall apply (1) to all money and other personal property delivered to the State Treasurer or State Controller prior to the effective date of said sections, which would have been subject to the provisions thereof if they had been in effect on the date of such delivery; and (2) to all money and other personal property delivered to the State Treasurer or State Controller prior to the effective date of the 1961 amendments to said sections, as said provisions would have applied on the date of such delivery if, on said date of delivery, the provisions of Chapter 1809, Statutes of 1959, had not been in effect.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

4132.

(a) It is hereby declared that the provisions of this code reflect the concern of the Legislature that persons with mental health disorders are to be regarded as patients to be provided care and treatment and not as inmates of institutions for the purposes of secluding them from the rest of the public.

(b) Whenever any provision of this code heretofore or hereafter enacted uses the term “inmate,” it shall be construed to mean “patient.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 69.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4133.

All day hospitals and rehabilitation centers maintained by the State Department of State Hospitals shall be subject to the provisions of this code pertaining to the admission, transfer, and discharge of patients at the state hospitals, except that all admissions to those facilities shall be subject to the approval of the chief officer thereof. Charges for services rendered to patients at those facilities shall be determined pursuant to Section 4025. The liability for the charges shall be governed by the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 7275) of Chapter 2 of Division 7, except at the hospitals maintained by the State Department of Developmental Services the liability shall be governed by the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 6715) of
 Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 6 and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 99.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4134.

The state mental hospitals under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals shall comply with the California Food Sanitation Act, Article 1 (commencing with Section 111950) of Chapter 4 of Part 6 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

The state mental hospitals under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals shall also comply with the California Retail Food Code (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 113700) of Part 7 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code).

Sanitation, health and hygiene standards that have been adopted by a city, county, or city and county that are more strict than those of the California Retail Food Code or the
 California Food Sanitation Act shall not be applicable to state mental hospitals that are under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 100.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4135.

Any person committed to the State Department of State Hospitals as a mentally abnormal sex offender shall remain a patient committed to the department for the period specified in the court order of commitment or until discharged by the medical director of the state hospital in which the person is a patient, whichever occurs first. The medical director may grant the patient a leave of absence upon the terms and conditions as the medical director deems proper. The petition for commitment of a person as a mentally abnormal sex offender, the reports, the court orders, and other court documents filed in the court in connection therewith shall not be open to inspection by any other than the parties to the proceeding, the attorneys for the party or parties, and the State
 Department of State Hospitals, except upon the written authority of a judge of the superior court of the county in which the proceedings were had.

Records of the supervision, care, and treatment given to each person committed to the State Department of State Hospitals as a mentally abnormal sex offender shall not be open to the inspection of any person not in the employ of the department or of the state hospital, except that a judge of the superior court may by order permit examination of those records.

The charges for the care and treatment rendered to persons committed as mentally abnormal sex offenders shall be in accordance with the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 7275) of Chapter 3 of Division 7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 101.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4136.

(a) Each patient in a state hospital who has resided in the state hospital for a period of at least 30 days shall be paid an amount of aid for his or her personal and incidental needs that, when added to his or her income, equals twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) per month. If a patient elects to do so, a patient may save all or any portion of his or her monthly amount of aid provided for personal and incidental needs for expenditure in subsequent months.

(b) Each indigent patient in a state hospital shall be allotted sufficient materials for one letter each week, including postage in an amount not to exceed the cost of one stamp for first-class mail for a one-ounce letter, at no cost to the patient.

(c) Each newly admitted patient, for the first 30 days after his or her initial admission, shall be allotted sufficient materials for two letters each week, including postage for first-class mail for up to two one-ounce letters per week. The hospital administrator shall ensure that additional writing materials and postage are available for purchase by patients at the store or canteen on hospital grounds.

(d) For purposes of this section, “indigent patient” means a patient whose income is no more than twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) per month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 70.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4137.

Whenever a patient dies in a state mental hospital and the coroner finds that the death was by accident or at the hands of another person other than by accident, the State Department of State Hospitals shall determine upon review of the coroner’s investigation if the death resulted from the negligence, recklessness, or intentional act of a state employee. If it is determined that the death directly resulted from the negligence, recklessness, or intentional act of a state employee, the department shall immediately notify the State Personnel Board and any appropriate licensing agency and shall terminate the employment of the employee as provided by law. In addition, if the state employee is a licensed mental health professional, the appropriate licensing board shall
 inquire into the circumstances of the death, examine the findings of the coroner’s investigation, and make a determination of whether the mental health professional should have his or her license revoked or suspended or be subject to other disciplinary action. “Licensed mental health professional,” as used in this section, means a person licensed by any board, bureau, department, or agency pursuant to a state law and employed in a state mental hospital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 102.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4138.

(a) Upon receiving a request from the director of a state hospital listed in Section 4100, the Director of State Hospitals may prohibit the possession or use of tobacco products on the grounds of the requesting facility. The Director of State Hospitals shall provide an implementation plan that shall include a phase-in period for any of the state hospitals listed in Section 4100 that prohibits the possession or use of tobacco products by patients or any other persons on hospital grounds, except on the premises of residential staff housing where patients are not present.

(b) This prohibition shall include an exemption for departmentally approved religious ceremonies.

(c) As part of the implementation plan, the department shall provide any requesting patient with a smoking cessation plan that may include, at minimum, an individual medical treatment plan, counseling, prescription drugs, or nicotine replacement, as determined to be medically necessary and appropriate.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the outside activity time currently available to hospital patients.

(e) If an implementation plan is adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), the store or canteen at any facility subject to the prohibition shall not sell tobacco products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 103.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)